Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 5. Miscellaneous.

§ 13.1-514.
Exemptions.

The following securities are exempted from the securities registration requirements of this chapter:

Any security (including a revenue obligation) issued or guaranteed by the United States, any state, any political subdivision of a state or any agency or corporate or other instrumentality of one or more of the foregoing; or any certificate of deposit for any of the foregoing;

Any security issued or guaranteed by Canada, any Canadian province, any political subdivision of any such province, any agency or corporate or other instrumentality of one or more of the foregoing or any other foreign government with which the United States currently maintains diplomatic relations, if the security is recognized as a valid obligation by such issuer or guarantor;

Any security issued by and representing an interest in or a debt of, or guaranteed by, the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, or any national bank, or any bank or trust company organized under the laws of any state or trust subsidiary organized under the provisions of Article 3 (§

6.2-1047

et seq.) of Chapter 10 of Title 6.2;

Any security issued by and representing an interest in or a debt of, or guaranteed by, any federal savings and loan association or savings bank, or by any savings and loan association or savings bank which is organized under the laws of this Commonwealth;

Any security issued or guaranteed by an insurance company licensed to transact insurance business in this Commonwealth;

Any security issued by any credit union, industrial loan association or consumer finance company which is organized under the laws of this Commonwealth and is supervised and examined by the Commission;

Any security issued or guaranteed by any railroad, other common carrier or public service company supervised as to its rates and the issuance of its securities by a governmental authority of the United States, any state, Canada or any Canadian province;

Any security which is listed or approved for listing upon notice of issuance on the New York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange or any other security of the same issuer which is of senior or substantially equal rank; any security called for by subscription rights or warrants admitted to trading in any of said exchanges; or any warrant or right to subscribe to any of the foregoing securities;

Any commercial paper which arises out of a current transaction or the proceeds of which have been or are to be used for current transactions, and which evidences an obligation to pay cash within nine months after the date of issuance, exclusive of days of grace, or any renewal thereof which is likewise limited, or any guaranty of such paper or of any such renewal;

Any security issued in connection with an employee’s stock purchase, savings, pension, profit-sharing or similar benefit plan. The Commission may by rule or order, as to any security issued pursuant to such plan, specify or designate persons eligible to participate in such plan;

Any security issued by a cooperative association organized as a corporation under the laws of this Commonwealth;

Any security listed on an exchange registered with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission or quoted on an automated quotation system operated by a national securities association registered with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission and approved by regulations of the State Corporation Commission;

Any security issued by any issuer organized under the laws of any foreign country and approved by rule or regulation of the Commission.

The following transactions are exempted from the securities, broker-dealer and agent registration requirements of this chapter except as expressly provided in this subsection:

Any isolated transaction by the owner or pledgee of a security, whether effected through a broker-dealer or not, which is not directly or indirectly for the benefit of the issuer;

Any nonissuer distribution by a registered broker-dealer and its registered agent of a security that has been outstanding in the hands of the public for the past five years, if the issuer in each of the past three fiscal years has lawfully paid dividends on its common stock aggregating at least four percent of its current market price;

Any transaction by a registered broker-dealer and its registered agent pursuant to an unsolicited order or offer to buy;

Any transaction in a bond or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a real or chattel mortgage or deed of trust or by an agreement for the sale of real estate or chattels, if the entire indebtedness secured thereby is offered and sold as a unit;

Any transaction in his official capacity by a receiver, trustee in bankruptcy or other judicially appointed officer selling securities pursuant to court order;

Any offer or sale to a corporation, investment company or pension or profit-sharing trust or to a broker-dealer;

Any sale of its securities by an issuer or any sale of securities by a registered broker-dealer and its registered agent acting on behalf of an issuer if, after the sale, such issuer has not more than 35 security holders, and if its securities have not been offered to the general public by advertisement or solicitation; or

To the extent the Commission by rule or order permits, any sale of its securities by an issuer or any sale of securities by a registered broker-dealer and its registered agent acting on behalf of an issuer to not more than 35 persons in the Commonwealth during any period of 12 consecutive months, whether or not the issuer or any purchaser is then present in the Commonwealth, if the issuer or broker-dealer reasonably believes that all the purchasers in the Commonwealth are purchasing for investment, and if the securities have not been offered to the general public by advertisement or general solicitation. The Commission may, by rule or order, as to any security or transaction or any type of security or transaction, withdraw or further condition this exemption, increase or decrease the number of purchasers permitted, or waive the condition relating to their investment intent. The Commission may assess and collect in connection with any filing pursuant to this exemption a nonrefundable fee not to exceed $250.With respect to this subdivision 7, and except to the extent the Commission by rule or order may otherwise permit, the number of security holders of an issuer or the number of purchasers from an issuer, as the case may be, shall not be deemed to include the security holders of any other corporation, partnership, limited liability company, unincorporated association or trust unless it was organized to raise capital for the issuer. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 15, the merger or consolidation of corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, unincorporated associations or other entities shall be a violation of this chapter if the surviving or new entity has more than 35 security holders or purchasers and all the securities of the parties thereto were issued under this exemption, unless all of the parties thereto have been engaged in transacting business for more than two years prior to the merger or consolidation;

The aggregate price of securities in an offering under this exemption does not exceed $2 million, which sum the Commission, by rule or order, may increase or decrease;

The total consideration paid by any purchaser of securities in an offering under this exemption does not exceed $10,000, unless the purchaser is an accredited investor as defined by Rule 501 of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission’s Regulation D (17 C.F.R. § 230.501). The Commission, by rule or order, may increase or decrease such limit on the total consideration to be paid by any purchaser of securities in an offering under this exemption;

No compensation is paid to employees, agents, or other persons for the solicitation of, or based on the sale of, securities in connection with an offering of securities under this exemption to any person who is not registered as a broker-dealer or agent, except to the extent permitted by rule or order of the Commission;

Neither the issuer nor any person related to the issuer is subject to disqualification as established by the Commission by rule or order; and

The security is sold in an offering conducted in compliance with any conditions established by rule or order of the Commission, which may include:

Restrictions on the nature of the issuer;

Limitations on the number and manner of offerings;

Disclosures required to be provided to investors, including disclosures of risk factors related to the issuer and the offering;

Requirements that all proceeds received from purchasers be placed in escrow in a depository institution located in the Commonwealth until the minimum amount of the offering is raised;

Filings with the Commission of notices and other materials related to the offering;

Requirements regarding the preparation and submission of the issuer’s financial statements, including (i) the form and content of such statements and (ii) whether such statements are required to be audited or reviewed by an independent certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles; and

Requirements that the entity issuing the security is formed, organized, or existing under the laws of the Commonwealth. However, for an offering conducted in accordance with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission’s Rule 147A, the entity issuing the security may be formed or organized outside the Commonwealth, provided that the entity has its principal place of business in the Commonwealth and satisfies at least one of the doing business requirements in 17 C.F.R. § 230.147A (c) 2.The Commission may assess and collect in connection with any filing pursuant to this exemption a nonrefundable fee in an amount to be set by the Commission by rule or order, provided such amount shall not exceed $500;

Any transaction pursuant to an offer to existing security holders of the issuer including holders of transferable warrants issued to existing security holders and exercisable within 90 days of their issuance, if either (i) no commission or other remuneration (other than a standby commission) is paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any security holder in this Commonwealth or (ii) the issuer first notifies the Commission in writing of the terms of the offer and the Commission does not by order disallow the exemption within five full business days after the date of the receipt of the notice;

Any offer (but not a sale) of a security for which registration statements have been filed, but are not effective, under both this chapter and the Securities Act of 1933; but this exemption shall not apply while a stop order is in effect or, after notice to the issuer, while a proceeding or examination looking toward such an order is pending under either act;

The issuance of not more than three shares of common stock to one or more of the incorporators of a corporation and the initial transfer thereof;

Sales of an issue of bonds, aggregating $150,000 or less, secured by a first lien deed of trust on realty situated in Virginia, to 30 persons or less who are residents of Virginia;

Any offer or sale of any interest in any partnership, corporation, association or other entity created solely to provide residential housing located in the Commonwealth, provided that such offer or sale is by the issuer or by a real estate broker or real estate agent duly licensed in Virginia;

The Commission is authorized to create by rule a limited offering exemption, the purpose of which shall be to further the objectives of compatibility with similar exemptions from federal securities regulation and uniformity among the states; providing that such rule shall not exempt broker-dealers or agents from the registration requirements of this chapter, except in the case of an agent of the issuer who either (i) receives no sales commission directly or indirectly for offering or selling the securities or (ii) effects transactions in a security exempt from registration under the Securities Act of 1933 pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated under § 4(2) thereof. Any filing made with the Commission pursuant to any exemption created under this subdivision shall be accompanied by a $250 fee;

The issuance of any security dividend, whether the corporation distributing the dividend is the issuer of the security or not, if nothing of value is given by stockholders for the distribution other than the surrender of a right to a cash dividend where the stockholder can elect to take a dividend in cash or in a security;

Any transaction incident to a right of conversion or a statutory or judicially approved reclassification, recapitalization, reorganization, quasi-reorganization, stock split, reverse stock split, merger, consolidation, sale of assets, or exchange of securities;

Any offer or sale of a security issued by a Virginia church if the offer and sale are only to its members and the security is offered and sold only by its members who are Virginia residents and who do not receive remuneration or compensation directly or indirectly for offering or selling the security;

Any offer or sale of securities issued by a professional business entity (as defined in subsection A of §

13.1-1102

) to a person licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render within this Commonwealth the same professional services (as defined in subsection A of §

13.1-1102

) rendered by the professional business entity. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this subdivision shall be deemed to provide that shares of stock, partnership or membership interests or other representations of ownership in a professional business entity are securities except to the extent otherwise provided by subsection A of this section;

Any offer that is communicated on the Internet, World Wide Web or similar proprietary or common carrier electronic system and that is in compliance with requirements prescribed by rule or order of the Commission;

To the extent the Commission by rule or order permits, any offer or sale to an accredited investor, as defined by the Commission, if the issuer reasonably believes before the sale that the accredited investor, either alone or with the accredited investor’s representative, has such knowledge and experience in financial and business matters as to be capable of evaluating the merits and risks of the prospective investment. The Commission may assess and collect in connection with any filing pursuant to this exemption a nonrefundable fee not to exceed $250;

Any transaction by a bank pursuant to an unsolicited offer or order to buy or sell any security, provided such transaction is not effected by an employee of the bank who is also an employee of a broker-dealer;

To the extent the Commission by rule or order permits, any security issued by an entity if:

Any offer or sale of securities conducted in accordance with Tier 2 of federal Regulation A (17 CFR 230.251 to 230.263) promulgated under § 3(b)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933 (U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission Release No. 33-9741, 80 Fed. Reg. 21806) to the extent such securities are preempted from the registration requirements of this chapter pursuant to Tier 2 of federal Regulation A. The Commission shall by rule or order prescribe any filings with the Commission of notices, renewals, and other materials. The Commission may assess and collect in connection with any filing pursuant to this exemption a nonrefundable filing fee not to exceed $500. The Commission shall provide information on its website regarding the differences between the exemption provided pursuant to this subdivision and the exemption provided pursuant to subdivision 21; and

Any nonissuer distribution by or through a registered broker-dealer and its registered agent of a security that is included in an electronic exchange, marketplace, system, or disclosure repository, which exchange, marketplace, system, or disclosure repository (i) makes information freely available to the public, (ii) is registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or rules promulgated thereunder, or (iii) is an Alternative Trading System regulated by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, and is approved by regulations of the State Corporation Commission.

In any proceeding under this chapter, the burden of proving an exemption shall be upon the person claiming it.

a.

The offering of the security is conducted in accordance with § 3(a)(11) of the Securities Act of 1933 and Rule 147 adopted under the Securities Act of 1933 or the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission’s Rule 147A;

b.

The offer and sale of the security are made only to residents of Virginia. However, for an offering conducted in accordance with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission’s Rule 147A, the offer may be made accessible to residents outside of Virginia provided that the sale of the security is made only to residents of Virginia;

History.

Code 1950, § 13-113; 1956, c. 428; 1966, c. 186; 1970, c. 286; 1972, c. 683; 1974, cc. 86, 830; 1975, cc. 75, 500; 1976, c. 656; 1977, c. 111; 1978, c. 397; 1981, cc. 347, 356, 362; 1982, c. 262; 1983, cc. 231, 516; 1984, cc. 298, 771; 1989, c. 388; 1990, c. 6; 1991, c. 223; 1993, c. 75; 1995, cc. 208, 213, 235; 1996, c. 16; 1997, cc. 279, 538; 1999, c. 92; 2001, c. 722; 2003, c. 595; 2007, c. 457; 2015, cc. 354, 400; 2016, c. 260; 2020, cc. 256, 279, 331.

Editor’s note.

For § 4 (2) of the Securities Act of 1933, referred to above, see 15 U.S.C.S. § 77d.

Acts 2001, c. 722, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2002.”

Effective October 1, 2010, “Article 3 (§

6.2-1047

et seq.) of Chapter 10 of Title 6.2” was substituted for “the Trust Subsidiary Act (§ 6.1-32.1 et seq.),” to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

Acts 2015, cc. 354 and 400, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall report by July 1, 2016, and each year thereafter until 2020, to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Commerce and Labor Committees on the implementation of this act, including (i) any updates on federal action, (ii) the number of filings in the Commonwealth made pursuant to this act, (iii) the mean, median, and total values related to money raised under offerings made pursuant to this act, and (iv) any recommendations for revisions to this act.”

Acts 2015, cc. 354 and 400, which added subdivision B 21, provide in cl. 3: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2020.” Acts 2020, cc. 279 and 331, cl. 2 repealed Acts 2015, cc. 354 and 400, cl. 3.

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection A, inserted “the Trust Subsidiary Act” at the end of subdivision 3, inserted the last sentence in subdivision 10; in subdivision B 7 b, deleted “offer or” following “order permits, any,” substituted “of its securities” for “in a transaction involving the sale,” inserted “or any sale of securities by a registered broker-dealer and its registered agent acting on behalf of an issuer” preceding “to not more than thirty-five,” inserted “or broker-dealer” preceding “reasonably believes,” and substituted “The Commission may, by rule or order, as to any security or transaction or any type of security or transaction, withdraw or further condition this exemption, increase or decrease the number of purchasers permitted, or waive the condition relating to their investment intent. The Commission may assess and collect in connection with any filing pursuant to this exemption” for “and the Commission may assess and collect in collection with any filing required by the rule or order,” added “With respect to this subdivision 7, and except to the extent the commission by rule or order may otherwise permit” at the beginning of the second paragaph of subdivision B 7 b, and added subdivision B 19.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 722, effective July 1, 2002, added subdivision B 20.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 595 substituted “12” for “twelve,” “30” for “thirty,” and “35” for “thirty-five” and “90” for “ninety” throughout the section; and substituted “its members and the security is offered and sold only by its members” for “and by its members” in subdivision B 16.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 457 inserted “but are not effective” preceding “under both this chapter” in subdivision B 9.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 354 and 400 are identical, expire July 1, 2020, and added subdivision B 21; and made related changes. For expiration of subdivision B 21, see Editor’s note.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 260 added subdivision B 22 and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 256 added subdivision B 23, and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 279 and 331 are identical, and deleted “formed, organized, or existing under the laws of the Commonwealth” in subdivision B 21; inserted “or the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission’s Rule 147A” in subdivision B 21 a; inserted the second sentence in subdivision B 21 b; added subdivision B 21 g (7); and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1536 (1970).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1370 (1976).

For survey on business and corporate law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 491 (1989).

For 1995 survey of business and corporate law, see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 825 (1995).

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 105.

§ 13.1-514.1.
Exemption of certain securities by order of Commission.

The Commission may by order exempt from the other provisions of this chapter any security that the Commission finds:

Is to be offered and sold as part of a community undertaking to attract new business or industry to the community, or to establish or continue financial assistance to an existing business or industry in the community;

Is sponsored by the local chamber of commerce, by a local industrial development corporation or by other groups of representative local businessmen; and

Is to be sold mainly to persons interested in the development of the community by salesmen who receive no compensation for offering and selling the security.

The Commission may also exempt any security it finds that is to be offered and sold by any person organized and operated not for private profit but exclusively for religious, educational, benevolent, charitable, fraternal, social, athletic or reformatory purposes, or as a chamber of commerce or trade or professional association.

The Commission may, by rule, exempt an offer, but not a sale, of a security from the securities and agent registration requirements of this chapter made by or on behalf of an issuer for the sole purpose of soliciting an indication of interest in receiving a prospectus (or its equivalent) for the security. The rulemaking proceeding shall give due consideration to the provisions of the national pilot project of the North American Securities Administrators Association, Inc., relating to the solicitations of indications of interest prior to the filing of a registration statement. The written documents, broadcasts and oral representations related to solicitation of an indication of interest made to potential investors are subject to the anti-fraud provisions of §

13.1-502

. If the Commission determines that such exemption should not be granted, it shall set forth the findings and conclusions upon which its decision is based in its order.

History.

1960, c. 71; 1976, c. 656; 1993, c. 75; 1994, cc. 184, 355; 1995, c. 245; 1997, c. 289.

§ 13.1-514.2.
Primacy of Virginia law to be maintained.

Pursuant to section 6(c) of the federal Philanthropy Protection Act of 1995, Pub. L. 104-62, the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia, which are referred to in subsections (a) and (b) of section 6 of the aforementioned federal law, shall not be preempted by such section.

On and after July 1, 1997, the provisions of this chapter together with any subsequent amendments thereto shall retain primacy and shall apply in all administrative and judicial actions.

History.

1997, c. 145.

Editor’s note.

For the federal Philanthropy Protection Act of 1995, Pub. L. 104-62, § 6, referred to above, see 15 U.S.C.S. § 80a-3a.

§ 13.1-515.
Advertising.

The Commission may require, subject to the limitations of § 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, in any particular case, any person who has published or circulated any advertisement or sales literature regarding a security, other than a federal covered security as defined in § 18(b)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, or an investment advisory service to file copies thereof with the Commission.

History.

1956, c. 428; 1987, c. 678; 1997, c. 279.

§ 13.1-516.
Misleading filings.

It shall be unlawful for any person willfully to make or cause to be made, in any document filed with the Commission or in any proceeding under this chapter, any statement which is, at the time and in the light of the circumstances in which it is made, false or misleading in any material respect.

History.

1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-517.
Consent to service of process.

Every nonresident registered as a broker-dealer, investment advisor, investment advisor representative or agent shall appoint in writing the clerk of the Commission as his agent upon whom may be served any process, notice, order or demand. Every nonresident issuer of a security registered hereunder who sells such security in this Commonwealth shall be deemed to have appointed the clerk of the Commission as his agent upon whom may be served, in any matter arising under this chapter, any process, notice, order or demand.
Service may be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

. A foreign corporation that has complied with §

13.1-759

or §

13.1-767

need not comply with this section.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-144, 13-145; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1987, c. 678; 1990, c. 263; 1991, c. 672.

§ 13.1-518.
Investigations; confidentiality of information and documents.

The Commission may make such investigations within or outside of this Commonwealth as it deems necessary to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate the provisions of this chapter or any order, rule or injunction of the Commission, and may require any broker-dealer, investment advisor, investment advisor representative, issuer or agent subject to the investigation to pay the actual costs of the investigation. The Commission shall have power to issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum to require the attendance of any person and the production of any papers for the purposes of such investigation. No person shall be excused from testifying on the ground that his testimony would tend to incriminate him, but if, after asserting his claim of the privilege, he is required to testify, he shall not be prosecuted or penalized on account of any transactions concerning which he does testify.

Information or documents obtained or prepared by any member, subordinate or employee of the Commission in the course of any examination or investigation conducted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed confidential and shall not be disclosed to the public. However, nothing contained herein shall be interpreted to prohibit or limit (i) the publication of the findings, decisions, orders, judgments or opinions of the Commission; (ii) the use of any such information or documents in proceedings by or before the Commission or a hearing examiner appointed by the Commission; (iii) the disclosure of any such information or documents to any quasi-governmental entity substantially associated with law enforcement or the securities or investment advisory business approved by rule of the Commission; or (iv) the disclosure of any such information or documents to any governmental entity approved by rule of the Commission, or to any attorney for the Commonwealth, or to the Attorney General of Virginia.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-134; 1956, c. 428; 1979, c. 379; 1987, c. 678; 1992, c. 157.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law and utility regulation for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1980).

§ 13.1-518.1.
Broker-dealers and investment advisors to file certain reports with Commission.

Every broker-dealer and investment advisor registered under this chapter shall file all reports made by such broker-dealers or investment advisors as the Commission, by rule, may require.

History.

1974, c. 381; 1997, c. 279.

§ 13.1-519.
Injunctions.

The Commission shall have all the power and authority of a court of record as provided in Article IX, Section 3 of the Constitution of Virginia to issue a temporary or a permanent injunction against any violation or attempted violation of any provision of this chapter or any order, rule, or regulation of the Commission issued pursuant to this chapter. For the violation of any injunction or order issued under this chapter it shall have the same power to punish for contempt as a court of equity.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-137; 1956, c. 428; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 1; 1992, c. 468; 1997, c. 279.

§ 13.1-520.
Crimes.

Any person who shall knowingly and willfully make, or cause to be made, any false statement in any book of account or other paper of any person subject to the provisions of this chapter, or knowingly and willfully exhibit any false paper to the Commission, or who shall knowingly and willfully commit any act declared unlawful by this chapter, with the intent to defraud any purchaser of securities or user of investment advisory services or with intent to deceive the Commission as to any material fact for the purpose of inducing the Commission to take any action or refrain from taking any action pursuant to this chapter, shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

Any person who shall knowingly make or cause to be made any false statement in any book of account or other paper of any person subject to the provisions of this chapter or exhibit any false paper to the Commission or who shall commit any act declared unlawful by this chapter shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Prosecutions under this section shall be instituted by indictments in the courts of record having jurisdiction of felonies within three years from the date of the offense.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-152, 13-155; 1956, c. 428; 1977, c. 484; 1987, c. 678.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felony, see §

18.2-10

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 13.1-520.1.
Commission may transmit record or complaint to locality where violation occurred.

The Commission may transmit the record of any proceeding or any complaint involving any violation of this Act to the attorney for the Commonwealth in the county or city wherein the violation occurred.

History.

1974, c. 253.

§ 13.1-521.
Violations punishable by the Commission.

The Commission may, by judgment entered after a hearing on 30 days’ notice to the defendant, if it is proved that the defendant has knowingly made any misrepresentation of a material fact for the purpose of inducing the Commission to take any action or to refrain from taking action, or has violated any provision of this chapter or any order, rule, or regulation of the Commission issued pursuant to this chapter, impose a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000, which shall be collectible by the process of the Commission as provided by law.

In addition to imposing the penalty set forth in subsection A, or without imposing such penalty, the Commission may, in any such case, revoke any authority or registration issued by the Commission to or at the instance of the defendant.

Each sale of a security contrary to the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a separate violation. The Commission may in any such case under subsection A order the seller to rescind any such sale and to make restitution to the purchaser and the Commission shall consider such rescission and restitution in determining whether a penalty should be imposed on him on account of that illegal sale, and if so, the amount of such penalty.

Each investment advisory contract, transaction or activity contrary to the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a separate violation. The Commission may in any such case under subsection A order the investment advisor or investment advisor representative to rescind any such contract or transaction and to make restitution to the user of the investment advisory service and the Commission shall consider such rescission and restitution in determining whether a penalty should be imposed on him on account of that illegal contract, transaction or activity and, if so, the amount of such penalty.

The provisions of subsections C and D of this section regarding rescission and restitution apply only to this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-153; 1956, c. 428; 1987, c. 678; 1990, c. 31; 2000, c. 166; 2009, c. 566.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 166 substituted “Violations” for “Offenses” in the catchline; in subsection A, substituted “thirty days’ notice to the defendant,” for “notice duly served on the defendant not less than thirty days before the date of the hearing,” and inserted “civil” preceding “penalty not exceeding $5,000”; in the first sentence of subsection C, substituted “security contrary to” for “security in violation of” and substituted “violation” for “offense”; and in the first sentence of subsection D, substituted “contrary to” for “in violation of” and “a separate violation” for “a separate offense.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 566, in subsection A, substituted “$10,000” for “$5,000”; in subsection C, substituted “in any such case under subsection A order” for “request,” “purchaser and the” for “purchaser. If the seller complies with the request, the” and “rescission and restitution” for “compliance”; in subsection D, substituted “in any such case under subsection A order” for “request,” deleted “if the investment advisor or investment advisor representative complies with the request” preceding “the Commission shall,” substituted “rescission and restitution” for “compliance”; and added subsection E.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).